vendor/tcllib-1.18/modules/textutil/eshyph_vo.tex
.\'a2
.\'aa2
.\'ae2
.\'ai2
.\'ao2
.\'au2
.\'e2
.\'ea2
.\'ee2
.\'ei2
.\'eo2
.\'eu2
.\'i2
.\'ia2
.\'ie2
.\'ii2
.\'io2
.\'iu2
.\'o2
.\'oa2
.\'oe2
.\'oi2
.\'oo2
.\'ou2
.\'u2
.\'ua2
.\'ue2
.\'ui2
.\'uo2
.\'uu2
.a2
.a\'a2
.a\'e2
.a\'i2
.a\'o2
.a\'u2
.aa2
.ae2
.ai2
.ao2
.au2
.e2
.e\'a2
.e\'e2
.e\'i2
.e\'o2
.e\'u2
.ea2
.ee2
.ei2
.eo2
.eu2
.i2
.i\'a2
.i\'e2
.i\'i2
.i\'o2
.i\'u2
.ia2
.ie2
.ii2
.io2
.iu2
.o2
.o\'a2
.o\'e2
.o\'i2
.o\'o2
.o\'u2
.oa2
.oe2
.oi2
.oo2
.ou2
.u2
.u\'a2
.u\'e2
.u\'i2
.u\'o2
.u\'u2
.ua2
.ue2
.ui2
.uo2
.uu2
2\'a.
2\'aa.
2\'ae.
2\'ai.
2\'ao.
2\'au.
2\'e.
2\'ea.
2\'ee.
2\'ei.
2\'eo.
2\'eu.
2\'i.
2\'ia.
2\'ie.
2\'ii.
2\'io.
2\'iu.
2\'o.
2\'oa.
2\'oe.
2\'oi.
2\'oo.
2\'ou.
2\'u.
2\'ua.
2\'ue.
2\'ui.
2\'uo.
2\'uu.
2\~n1\~n
2\~n1b
2\~n1c
2\~n1d
2\~n1f
2\~n1g
2\~n1h
2\~n1j
2\~n1k
2\~n1m
2\~n1n
2\~n1p
2\~n1q
2\~n1s
2\~n1t
2\~n1v
2\~n1w
2\~n1x
2\~n1y
2\~n1z
2a.
2a\'a.
2a\'e.
2a\'i.
2a\'o.
2a\'u.
2aa.
2ae.
2ai.
2ao.
2au.
2b1\~n
2b1b
2b1c
2b1d
2b1f
2b1g
2b1h
2b1j
2b1k
2b1m
2b1n
2b1p
2b1q
2b1s
2b1t
2b1v
2b1w
2b1x
2b1y
2b1z
2c1\~n
2c1b
2c1c
2c1d
2c1f
2c1g
2c1j
2c1k
2c1m
2c1n
2c1p
2c1q
2c1s
2c1t
2c1v
2c1w
2c1x
2c1y
2c1z
2d1\~n
2d1b
2d1c
2d1d
2d1f
2d1g
2d1h
2d1j
2d1k
2d1m
2d1n
2d1p
2d1q
2d1s
2d1t
2d1v
2d1w
2d1x
2d1y
2d1z
2e.
2e\'a.
2e\'e.
2e\'i.
2e\'o.
2e\'u.
2ea.
2ee.
2ei.
2eo.
2eu.
2f1\~n
2f1b
2f1c
2f1d
2f1f
2f1g
2f1h
2f1j
2f1k
2f1m
2f1n
2f1p
2f1q
2f1s
2f1t
2f1v
2f1w
2f1x
2f1y
2f1z
2g1\~n
2g1b
2g1c
2g1d
2g1f
2g1g
2g1h
2g1j
2g1k
2g1m
2g1n
2g1p
2g1q
2g1s
2g1t
2g1v
2g1w
2g1x
2g1y
2g1z
2h1\~n
2h1b
2h1c
2h1d
2h1f
2h1g
2h1h
2h1j
2h1k
2h1m
2h1n
2h1p
2h1q
2h1s
2h1t
2h1v
2h1w
2h1x
2h1y
2h1z
2i.
2i\'a.
2i\'e.
2i\'i.
2i\'o.
2i\'u.
2ia.
2ie.
2ii.
2io.
2iu.
2j1\~n
2j1b
2j1c
2j1d
2j1f
2j1g
2j1h
2j1j
2j1k
2j1m
2j1n
2j1p
2j1q
2j1s
2j1t
2j1v
2j1w
2j1x
2j1y
2j1z
2k1\~n
2k1b
2k1c
2k1d
2k1f
2k1g
2k1h
2k1j
2k1k
2k1m
2k1n
2k1p
2k1q
2k1s
2k1t
2k1v
2k1w
2k1x
2k1y
2k1z
2l1\~n
2l1b
2l1c
2l1d
2l1f
2l1g
2l1h
2l1j
2l1k
2l1m
2l1n
2l1p
2l1q
2l1s
2l1t
2l1v
2l1w
2l1x
2l1y
2l1z
2m1\~n
2m1b
2m1c
2m1d
2m1f
2m1g
2m1h
2m1j
2m1k
2m1l
2m1m
2m1n
2m1p
2m1q
2m1r
2m1s
2m1t
2m1v
2m1w
2m1x
2m1y
2m1z
2n1\~n
2n1b
2n1c
2n1d
2n1f
2n1g
2n1h
2n1j
2n1k
2n1l
2n1m
2n1n
2n1p
2n1q
2n1r
2n1s
2n1t
2n1v
2n1w
2n1x
2n1y
2n1z
2o.
2o\'a.
2o\'e.
2o\'i.
2o\'o.
2o\'u.
2oa.
2oe.
2oi.
2oo.
2ou.
2p1\~n
2p1b
2p1c
2p1d
2p1f
2p1g
2p1h
2p1j
2p1k
2p1m
2p1n
2p1p
2p1q
2p1s
2p1t
2p1v
2p1w
2p1x
2p1y
2p1z
2q1\~n
2q1b
2q1c
2q1d
2q1f
2q1g
2q1h
2q1j
2q1k
2q1m
2q1n
2q1p
2q1q
2q1s
2q1t
2q1v
2q1w
2q1x
2q1y
2q1z
2r1\~n
2r1b
2r1c
2r1d
2r1f
2r1g
2r1h
2r1j
2r1k
2r1m
2r1n
2r1p
2r1q
2r1s
2r1t
2r1v
2r1w
2r1x
2r1y
2r1z
2s1\~n
2s1b
2s1c
2s1d
2s1f
2s1g
2s1h
2s1j
2s1k
2s1m
2s1n
2s1p
2s1q
2s1s
2s1t
2s1v
2s1w
2s1x
2s1y
2s1z
2t1\~n
2t1b
2t1c
2t1d
2t1f
2t1g
2t1h
2t1j
2t1k
2t1m
2t1n
2t1p
2t1q
2t1s
2t1t
2t1v
2t1w
2t1x
2t1y
2t1z
2u.
2u\'a.
2u\'e.
2u\'i.
2u\'o.
2u\'u.
2ua.
2ue.
2ui.
2uo.
2uu.
2v1\~n
2v1b
2v1c
2v1d
2v1f
2v1g
2v1h
2v1j
2v1k
2v1m
2v1n
2v1p
2v1q
2v1s
2v1t
2v1v
2v1w
2v1x
2v1y
2v1z
2w1\~n
2w1b
2w1c
2w1d
2w1f
2w1g
2w1h
2w1j
2w1k
2w1m
2w1n
2w1p
2w1q
2w1s
2w1t
2w1v
2w1w
2w1x
2w1y
2w1z
2x1\~n
2x1b
2x1c
2x1d
2x1f
2x1g
2x1h
2x1j
2x1k
2x1m
2x1n
2x1p
2x1q
2x1s
2x1t
2x1v
2x1w
2x1x
2x1y
2x1z
2y1\~n
2y1b
2y1c
2y1d
2y1f
2y1g
2y1h
2y1j
2y1k
2y1m
2y1n
2y1p
2y1q
2y1s
2y1t
2y1v
2y1w
2y1x
2y1y
2y1z
2z1\~n
2z1b
2z1c
2z1d
2z1f
2z1g
2z1h
2z1j
2z1k
2z1m
2z1n
2z1p
2z1q
2z1s
2z1t
2z1v
2z1w
2z1x
2z1y
2z1z
\'a1\'i
\'a1\'u
\'a1\~n
\'a1a
\'a1b
\'a1c
\'a1d
\'a1e
\'a1f
\'a1g
\'a1h
\'a1j
\'a1k
\'a1l
\'a1m
\'a1n
\'a1o
\'a1p
\'a1q
\'a1r
\'a1s
\'a1t
\'a1v
\'a1w
\'a1x
\'a1y
\'a1z
\'a2\~n.
\'a2b.
\'a2c.
\'a2d.
\'a2f.
\'a2g.
\'a2h.
\'a2j.
\'a2k.
\'a2l.
\'a2m.
\'a2n.
\'a2p.
\'a2q.
\'a2r.
\'a2s.
\'a2t.
\'a2v.
\'a2w.
\'a2x.
\'a2y.
\'a2z.
\'e1\'i
\'e1\'u
\'e1\~n
\'e1a
\'e1b
\'e1c
\'e1d
\'e1e
\'e1f
\'e1g
\'e1h
\'e1j
\'e1k
\'e1l
\'e1m
\'e1n
\'e1o
\'e1p
\'e1q
\'e1r
\'e1s
\'e1t
\'e1v
\'e1w
\'e1x
\'e1y
\'e1z
\'e2\~n.
\'e2b.
\'e2c.
\'e2d.
\'e2f.
\'e2g.
\'e2h.
\'e2j.
\'e2k.
\'e2l.
\'e2m.
\'e2n.
\'e2p.
\'e2q.
\'e2r.
\'e2s.
\'e2t.
\'e2v.
\'e2w.
\'e2x.
\'e2y.
\'e2z.
\'i1\'a
\'i1\'e
\'i1\'o
\'i1\~n
\'i1a
\'i1b
\'i1c
\'i1d
\'i1e
\'i1f
\'i1g
\'i1h
\'i1j
\'i1k
\'i1l
\'i1m
\'i1n
\'i1o
\'i1p
\'i1q
\'i1r
\'i1s
\'i1t
\'i1v
\'i1w
\'i1x
\'i1y
\'i1z
\'i2\~n.
\'i2b.
\'i2c.
\'i2d.
\'i2f.
\'i2g.
\'i2h.
\'i2j.
\'i2k.
\'i2l.
\'i2m.
\'i2n.
\'i2p.
\'i2q.
\'i2r.
\'i2s.
\'i2t.
\'i2v.
\'i2w.
\'i2x.
\'i2y.
\'i2z.
\'o1\'i
\'o1\'u
\'o1\~n
\'o1a
\'o1b
\'o1c
\'o1d
\'o1e
\'o1f
\'o1g
\'o1h
\'o1j
\'o1k
\'o1l
\'o1m
\'o1n
\'o1o
\'o1p
\'o1q
\'o1r
\'o1s
\'o1t
\'o1v
\'o1w
\'o1x
\'o1y
\'o1z
\'o2\~n.
\'o2b.
\'o2c.
\'o2d.
\'o2f.
\'o2g.
\'o2h.
\'o2j.
\'o2k.
\'o2l.
\'o2m.
\'o2n.
\'o2p.
\'o2q.
\'o2r.
\'o2s.
\'o2t.
\'o2v.
\'o2w.
\'o2x.
\'o2y.
\'o2z.
\'u1\'a
\'u1\'e
\'u1\'o
\'u1\~n
\'u1a
\'u1b
\'u1c
\'u1d
\'u1e
\'u1f
\'u1g
\'u1h
\'u1j
\'u1k
\'u1l
\'u1m
\'u1n
\'u1o
\'u1p
\'u1q
\'u1r
\'u1s
\'u1t
\'u1v
\'u1w
\'u1x
\'u1y
\'u1z
\'u2\~n.
\'u2b.
\'u2c.
\'u2d.
\'u2f.
\'u2g.
\'u2h.
\'u2j.
\'u2k.
\'u2l.
\'u2m.
\'u2n.
\'u2p.
\'u2q.
\'u2r.
\'u2s.
\'u2t.
\'u2v.
\'u2w.
\'u2x.
\'u2y.
\'u2z.
a1\'a
a1\'e
a1\'i
a1\'o
a1\'u
a1\~n
a1a
a1b
a1c
a1d
a1e
a1f
a1g
a1h
a1j
a1k
a1l
a1m
a1n
a1o
a1p
a1q
a1r
a1s
a1t
a1v
a1w
a1x
a1y
a1z
a2\~n.
a2b.
a2c.
a2d.
a2f.
a2g.
a2h.
a2j.
a2k.
a2l.
a2m.
a2n.
a2p.
a2q.
a2r.
a2s.
a2t.
a2v.
a2w.
a2x.
a2y.
a2z.
e1\'a
e1\'e
e1\'i
e1\'o
e1\'u
e1\~n
e1a
e1b
e1c
e1d
e1e
e1f
e1g
e1h
e1j
e1k
e1l
e1m
e1n
e1o
e1p
e1q
e1r
e1s
e1t
e1v
e1w
e1x
e1y
e1z
e2\~n.
e2b.
e2c.
e2d.
e2f.
e2g.
e2h.
e2j.
e2k.
e2l.
e2m.
e2n.
e2p.
e2q.
e2r.
e2s.
e2t.
e2v.
e2w.
e2x.
e2y.
e2z.
i1\~n
i1b
i1c
i1d
i1f
i1g
i1h
i1j
i1k
i1l
i1m
i1n
i1p
i1q
i1r
i1s
i1t
i1v
i1w
i1x
i1y
i1z
i2\~n.
i2b.
i2c.
i2d.
i2f.
i2g.
i2h.
i2j.
i2k.
i2l.
i2m.
i2n.
i2p.
i2q.
i2r.
i2s.
i2t.
i2v.
i2w.
i2x.
i2y.
i2z.
o1\'a
o1\'e
o1\'i
o1\'o
o1\'u
o1\~n
o1a
o1b
o1c
o1d
o1e
o1f
o1g
o1h
o1j
o1k
o1l
o1m
o1n
o1o
o1p
o1q
o1r
o1s
o1t
o1v
o1w
o1x
o1y
o1z
o2\~n.
o2b.
o2c.
o2d.
o2f.
o2g.
o2h.
o2j.
o2k.
o2l.
o2m.
o2n.
o2p.
o2q.
o2r.
o2s.
o2t.
o2v.
o2w.
o2x.
o2y.
o2z.
u1\~n
u1b
u1c
u1d
u1f
u1g
u1h
u1j
u1k
u1l
u1m
u1n
u1p
u1q
u1r
u1s
u1t
u1v
u1w
u1x
u1y
u1z
u2\~n.
u2b.
u2c.
u2d.
u2f.
u2g.
u2h.
u2j.
u2k.
u2l.
u2m.
u2n.
u2p.
u2q.
u2r.
u2s.
u2t.
u2v.
u2w.
u2x.
u2y.
u2z.
